Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB352.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1 of the act of August 5, 1932 (Sp.Sess., P.L.45, No.45), referred to as the Sterling Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1. * * *(d) A city of the first class that imposes a nonresident wage tax shall remit to the nonresident's resident municipality and school district an amount equal to the amount of tax imposed on earned income and net profits by the nonresident's resident municipality and school district.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516171819202122